Washington statutes.
RCW 32.04.300

Jurisdiction of courts as to cease and desist orders, orders to remove trustee, officer, or employee, etc.

The director may apply to the superior court of the county of the principal place of business of the mutual savings bank affected for the enforcement of any effective and outstanding order issued under RCW 32.04.250 or 32.16.093, and the court shall have jurisdiction to order compliance therewith.

No court shall have jurisdiction to affect by injunction or otherwise the issuance or enforcement of any such order, or to review, modify, suspend, terminate, or set aside any such order, except as provided in RCW 32.04.270, 32.04.280, and 32.04.290.

[ 1994 c 92 s 306; 1979 c 46 s 6.]

NOTES:

Severability—1979 c 46: See note following RCW 32.04.250.